District of Columbia statutes.
1-328.17

Grant transparency.

To ensure a transparent process for issuing and managing grants, the Office of Partnerships and Grants Development shall establish uniform guidelines for the application for and reporting on grants received from District government entities. The guidelines shall include a description of the project scope, budget, program activities, timelines, performance, and any appropriate financial information.

History

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 1098
as added Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 1053(f), 62 DCR 10905

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1053(f) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).